North Carolina statutes. Chapter 22A. Signatures.
§ 22A-1.
Use of a signature facsimile by a person with a disability.

A person with a disability, as defined in

G.S. 168A-3(7a)

, may use a registered signature facsimile as a proper mark of the person’s legal signature. An example of the signature facsimile shall be registered by the person with a disability with the clerk of the superior court in the county where the person lives. The registered signature facsimile may be revoked at any time in writing by the person with a disability.

History.

1973, c. 878; 1997-208, s. 1; 2009-570, s. 34.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-570, s. 34, effective August 28, 2009, substituted “person with a disability” for “handicapped person” in the section heading and throughout the section; and substituted “G.S. 168A-3(7a)” for “G.S. 168A-3(4)” in the first sentence.